Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-203
Rules; amend; copies; distribution; posting.

The Jail Standards Board may, as it may deem proper, amend the rules, and such amended rules and their copies shall be disposed of in the same manner as provided in section 47-202.

Laws 1915, c. 208, § 3, p. 463;

C.S.1922, § 3012;

C.S.1929, § 47-117;

R.S.1943, § 47-203;

Laws 1996, LB 233, § 14.